Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Service Creditable Toward Retirement

Administrative rules and regulations.

Administrative Rules, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia, Chapter 513-13-2.

47-17-70.
Prior service credit for members who first apply for membership on or after May 1, 1968; credit for service in the armed forces of the United States.

No peace officer who first makes application for membership in the fund on or after May 1, 1968, shall be given credit for any prior service, and such peace officer shall receive credit only from the date he or she becomes a member of the fund; provided, however, a member may claim a maximum of five years for service as a peace officer prior to such member’s joining the fund if such member complies with subsection (c) of Code Section 47-17-44 and remains an active member of the fund for a period of time at least equal to the number of years claimed for prior service; provided, further, that any member defined in subparagraph (J) of paragraph (5) of Code Section 47-17-1 may claim service as a peace officer prior to such member’s joining the fund without regard to such five-year limitation if such member complies with subsection (c) of Code Section 47-17-44.

A member who is determined by the board to be in good standing and who enlists in or is drafted into any branch of the armed forces of the United States shall not be required to remit any funds to the board during such period of service and shall receive credit for such service, provided that such member left his work as a peace officer to enter the armed forces of the United States and returned to work as a peace officer within six months after he ceased such service and engaged in no other type work within such six-month period. Such member shall receive one year of creditable service for each year of service in the armed forces of the United States, provided that there shall be a limit of five years of credit for such service. If a member remains in the armed forces of the United States longer than five years, his membership shall be terminated at the end of such five-year period but shall be reinstated if he returns to work as a peace officer within six months after he ceases such service and if he has not engaged in any other type work within such six-month period.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 472, § 5; Ga. L. 1956, p. 280, § 13; Ga. L. 1958, p. 341, § 9; Ga. L. 1962, p. 39, § 8; Ga. L. 1963, p. 386, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1984, p. 996, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 776, § 4.

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

47-17-71.
Grant of creditable service for active members previously denied membership in fund because of race or ethnicity.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide for the grant of creditable service to any active member of the fund for each month of prior service as a peace officer rendered prior to January 1, 1976, if during such period the member was denied membership in the fund or was actively prevented from making such application because of his or her race or ethnicity.

The board is authorized and directed to receive the applications of such members as would be eligible to receive creditable service under the terms and conditions as set forth in subsection (c) of this Code section. Entitlement to such creditable service shall attach upon the submission of application, subject to all provisions of this Code section relative to funding.

A member wishing to establish creditable service for service performed prior to January 1, 1976, as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, must make written application to the board during the six-month period from July 1, 2006 through December 31, 2006, and:

Provide the board with such proof of prior service as the board deems necessary, which shall include, at a minimum, pay records, tax returns, W-2 statements, or a sworn statement of the employer stating that the employment records bear proof of such employment. Such statement shall be subject to a civil fine of $5,000.00 for false swearing; and

Provide the board with a sworn statement of the applicant that he or she applied for membership in the fund and was denied membership, or that he or she was actively prevented from making such application because of his or her race or ethnicity. Such statement shall be subject to a civil fine of $5,000.00 for false swearing.

As soon as practicable following the last day for application, the board shall cause the actuary for the fund to determine the amount of funding necessary to grant the creditable service to all members whose applications are accepted and approved in accordance without creating any actuarial accrued liability as to the fund, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 20 of this title, the “Public Retirement Systems Standards Law.” A pro rata portion of one-half of such amount, determined by the number of months of creditable service requested by each person, shall be assigned as such person’s employee contribution required to receive such creditable service. The board shall notify each applicant of his or her pro rata share, and each such person shall pay such amount to the board not later than March 1, 2007, or thereafter be ineligible to receive such creditable service. During the regular 2007 session, the General Assembly may appropriate funds sufficient to cover one-half of the amount determined by the actuary as necessary to grant the creditable service, together with any portion of the total required employee contribution which was not received by the board from the applicants by March 1, 2007.

The creditable service provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be granted on July 1, 2007, only if the board receives the full amount determined by the actuary necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section. Otherwise, the board shall refund all amounts received from the members as employee contributions, together with regular interest thereon, and this Code section shall thereafter have no effect.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-17-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 117, § 1/HB 101; Ga. L. 2007, p. 62, § 1/SB 104.